Maryland, session 2026, SB0763.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
SUBTITLE 4E. MARYLAND GROWTH INITIATIVE.
10–4E–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “CORPORATION” MEANS THE MARYLAND TECHNOLOGY
DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION.
(C) “FUND” MEANS THE MARYLAND GROWTH INITIATIVE FUND.
(D) “INITIATIVE” MEANS THE MARYLAND GROWTH INITIATIVE.
10–4E–02.
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND GROWTH INITIATIVE IN THE CORPORATION.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE INITIATIVE IS TO SUPPORT THE GROWTH OF
START–UP COMPANIES IN THE STATE BY:
(1) IDENTIFYING PROMISING COMPANIES IN THE PHASE BETWEEN
EARLY START–UP DEVELOPMENT AND SCALING;
(2) PROVIDING ACCESS TO EXPERTS IN REGULATORY PROCESSES,
MANUFACTURING, CLINICAL TRIALS, MARKET LAUNCHES, AND OTHER AREAS OF
BUSINESS;
(3) FACILITATING PRIVATE INVESTMENT IN COMPANIES;
(4) ASSISTING IN THE ACQUISITION OF INFRASTRUCTURE INCLUDING
OFFICE SPACE, EQUIPMENT, AND SUPPORT FOR PRODUCT DEVELOPMENT; AND
(5) PROVIDING TECHNICAL AND BUSINESS EXPERTISE.
10–4E–03.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 381
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND GROWTH INITIATIVE FUND.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE POSTSEED AND SERIES A
FUNDING TO QUALIFIED BUSINESSES IN THE STATE TO SCALE UP WITHOUT NEEDING
TO RELOCATE.
(C) THE CORPORATION SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(D) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY, AND THE
COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(E) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(2) PUBLIC AND PRIVATE INVESTMENT FUNDS;
(3) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND
(4) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY:
(1) FOR THE PURPOSES DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION;
(2) FOR THE PURPOSES DESCRIBED IN § 10–4E–02 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
AND
(2) (3) TO PAY THE COSTS NECESSARY TO ADMINISTER THE
INITIATIVE.
(G) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INVESTMENT EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED
TO THE FUND.
– 3 –

Ch. 381 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(H) (1) THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL
AN APPROPRIATION OF $5,000,000 FOR THE INITIATIVE.
(2) THE FUNDING PROVIDED IN THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE USED TO
SUPPLEMENT, NOT SUPPLANT, ANY FUNDS THAT WOULD OTHERWISE BE PROVIDED
TO THE INITIATIVE.
10–4E–04.
(A) THE INITIATIVE SHALL CREATE A CURATED LIST OF COMPANIES IN THE
STATE THAT ARE BETWEEN THE START–UP AND SCALING PHASES.
(B) PRIORITY SHALL BE GIVEN TO COMPANIES THAT ARE:
(1) CURRENT OR PRIOR RECIPIENTS OF FUNDING FROM THE
MARYLAND INNOVATION INITIATIVE;
(2) CURRENT OR PRIOR RECIPIENTS OF FUNDING FROM ANY OTHER
PROGRAM ADMINISTERED BY THE CORPORATION; AND
(3) MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISES DESCRIBED IN § 9–4119(A) OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE; AND
(4) LOCATED IN A HIGH–NEED OR ECONOMICALLY DISTRESSED
GEOGRAPHIC AREA OF THE STATE AS DETERMINED BY THE CORPORATION.
10–4E–05.
THE CORPORATION MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS
SUBTITLE.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 381
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND
214. THE MARYLAND GROWTH INITIATIVE FUND.
Article – State Government
9–4119.
(a) This section applies to the following minority business enterprises:
(1) a publicly owned business if 1 or more minority persons own at least
51% of the stock of the business; or
(2) any other business if 1 or more minority persons own at least 50% of
the business.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 5 –